Ohio, session 136, HB600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.657 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.657. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the portion of the road known as state route number forty-one, running in an easterly and westerly direction, commencing at the intersection of that route and Ramsey road and extending to the intersection of that route and Dialton road, in Clark county, shall be known as the "PFC Wetzel Eldridge USMC Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.